dev/nouns.chopped.dix
    <pardef n="tēv/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="al/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ā</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ās</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ām</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pu/se__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sei</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sē</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šu</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sēm</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sēs</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sēm</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sēm</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="adrese"><i>adre</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="akadēmija"><i>akadēmij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="alga"><i>alg</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="apmācība"><i>apmācīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="asociācija"><i>asociācij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atmosfēra"><i>atmosfēr</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attīstība"><i>attīstīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="automašīna"><i>automašīn</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="banka"><i>bank</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="biedrība"><i>biedrīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bruņa"><i>bruņ</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cilvēks"><i>cilvēk</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cīņa"><i>cīņ</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="definīcija"><i>definīcij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="derība"><i>derīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dibinātājs"><i>dibinātāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dinastija"><i>dinastij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="doma"><i>dom</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dziesma"><i>dziesm</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrība"><i>elektrīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="filma"><i>film</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gaita"><i>gait</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ģitāra"><i>ģitār</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gleznotājs"><i>gleznotāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="grūtība"><i>grūtīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="hronika"><i>hronik</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iedzīvotājs"><i>iedzīvotāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="iekšpuse"><i>iekšpu</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iela"><i>iel</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ikona"><i>ikon</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="interese"><i>intere</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="īpatnība"><i>īpatnīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izejviela"><i>izejviel</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izlase"><i>izla</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izšķirtspēja"><i>izšķirtspēj</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izstrādātājs"><i>izstrādātāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="jūra"><i>jūr</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kanceleja"><i>kancelej</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kinoakadēmija"><i>kinoakadēmij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="klase"><i>kla</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonna"><i>kolonn</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="komiteja"><i>komitej</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kopa"><i>kop</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krāsa"><i>krās</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kvalifikācija"><i>kvalifikācij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lampa"><i>lamp</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="laulība"><i>laulīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lidmašīna"><i>lidmašīn</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="līnija"><i>līnij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="luga"><i>lug</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="maiņstrāva"><i>maiņstrāv</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="maksa"><i>maks</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mašīna"><i>mašīn</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mērvienība"><i>mērvienīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="molekula"><i>molekul</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="muiža"><i>muiž</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nesaskaņa"><i>nesaskaņ</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ola"><i>ol</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="orbīta"><i>orbīt</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pāreja"><i>pārej</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pasuga"><i>pasug</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="peļņa"><i>peļņ</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pieeja"><i>pieej</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pļava"><i>pļav</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prakse"><i>prak</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prasība"><i>prasīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prese"><i>pre</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="priekšrocība"><i>priekšrocīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="puse"><i>pu</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pussala"><i>pussal</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rādītājs"><i>rādītāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="reforma"><i>reform</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rīcība"><i>rīcīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rota"><i>rot</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sacensība"><i>sacensīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sala"><i>sal</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="secība"><i>secīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="senleja"><i>senlej</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="shēma"><i>shēm</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skala"><i>skal</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skulptūra"><i>skulptūr</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="slimnīca"><i>slimnīc</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="spēlētājs"><i>spēlētāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="starpība"><i>starpīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stunda"><i>stund</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="svārstība"><i>svārstīb</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tehnika"><i>tehnik</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tēvs"><i>tēv</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tirgotājs"><i>tirgotāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tradīcija"><i>tradīcij</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trase"><i>tra</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="turks"><i>turk</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vadītājs"><i>vadītāj</i><par n="tēv/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vārdnīca"><i>vārdnīc</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="viela"><i>viel</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="virspuse"><i>virspu</i><par n="pu/se__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ziņa"><i>ziņ</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Venta"><i>Vent</i><par n="al/a__n_f"/></e>
